Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 3. Usury.

§ 6.2-304.
Plea of usury; judgment.

Any borrower may plead in general terms that the contract on which the action is brought was for the payment of interest greater than is allowed by statute. If the court determines that the contract is usurious, judgment shall be rendered only for the principal sum.

History.

1987, c. 622, § 6.1-330.56; 2010, c. 794.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 9 provides: “That the provisions of §§

6.2-304

,

6.2-305

, and

6.2-306

shall apply to all loans made under (i) §

6.2-327

, (ii) former § 6.1-330.71 that closed between July 1, 1987, and the effective date of this act, or (iii) former § 6.1-330.16 as amended in 1986, that closed between July 1, 1986, and July 1, 1987. For the purposes of this enactment, a loan shall be deemed closed upon the initial recordation of the deed of trust or mortgage securing the loan.”

§ 6.2-305.
Recovery of twice total usurious interest paid; limitation of action; injunction to prevent sale of property pending action; effect of errors in computation.

If interest in excess of that permitted by an applicable statute is paid upon any loan, the person paying may bring an action within two years from the first to occur of: (i) the date of the last scheduled loan payment or (ii) the date of payment of the loan in full, to recover from the person taking or receiving such payments:

The total amount of the interest paid to such person in excess of that permitted by the applicable statute;

Twice the total amount of interest paid to such person during the two years immediately preceding the date of the filing of the action; and

Court costs and reasonable attorney fees.

If the sale of property in which an interest has been conveyed to secure the payment of the debt is scheduled or anticipated, an injunction may be granted to prevent such sale pending the completion of an action brought pursuant to subsection A.

Any creditor who proves that interest or other charges in excess of those permitted by law were imposed or collected as a result of a bona fide error in computation or similar mistake shall not be liable for the penalties prescribed in this section. In such event, the creditor shall only be liable to return to the borrower the amount of interest or other charges collected in excess of the amount permitted by applicable statute.

History.

1987, c. 622, § 6.1-330.57; 2010, c. 794.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 9 provides: “That the provisions of §§

6.2-304

,

6.2-305

, and

6.2-306

shall apply to all loans made under (i) §

6.2-327

, (ii) former § 6.1-330.71 that closed between July 1, 1987, and the effective date of this act, or (iii) former § 6.1-330.16 as amended in 1986, that closed between July 1, 1986, and July 1, 1987. For the purposes of this enactment, a loan shall be deemed closed upon the initial recordation of the deed of trust or mortgage securing the loan.”

§ 6.2-306.
Waiver of rights violative of public policy.

Any agreement or contract in which the borrower waives the benefits of this chapter or releases any rights he may have acquired under this chapter shall be deemed to be against public policy and void.

The provisions of subsection A shall not apply to a waiver of benefits or release of rights made subsequent to a loan as part of a settlement of potential or pending claims by a borrower involving such loan.

History.

1987, c. 622, § 6.1-330.58; 2010, c. 794.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 9 provides: “That the provisions of §§

6.2-304

,

6.2-305

, and

6.2-306

shall apply to all loans made under (i) §

6.2-327

, (ii) former § 6.1-330.71 that closed between July 1, 1987, and the effective date of this act, or (iii) former § 6.1-330.16 as amended in 1986, that closed between July 1, 1986, and July 1, 1987. For the purposes of this enactment, a loan shall be deemed closed upon the initial recordation of the deed of trust or mortgage securing the loan.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-1020 Supplemental Deed of Trust for Additional Security — Another Form.

§ 6.2-307.
Assertion of defenses or claims by borrowers; effect of assignment.

As to any loan to which the provisions of §§

6.2-327

and

6.2-328

are applicable, the borrower may assert any defense or claim he may have under §§

6.2-304

and

6.2-305

against any assignee or transferee of the contract of indebtedness.

History.

1987, c. 622, § 6.1-330.59; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-308.
Entities not permitted to plead usury.

No (i) corporation, (ii) partnership that is required to file a certificate pursuant to Chapter 2.1 (§

50-73.1

et seq.) of Title 50 or was required to file a certificate pursuant to former Chapter 2 (§

50-44

et seq.) or Chapter 3 (§

50-74

et seq.) of Title 50 or that is formed under laws other than those of the Commonwealth, (iii) limited liability company, (iv) business trust, or (v) joint venture organized for the purpose of holding, developing, and managing real estate for profit, shall, by way of defense or otherwise, avail itself of any of the provisions of this chapter or any other statutory or case law relating to usury or compounding of interest to avoid or defeat the payment of any interest or any other sum that it has contracted to pay.

Nothing contained in this chapter or any other statutory or case law relating to usury or compounding of interest shall be construed to prevent the recovery of interest or any other sum that an entity described in subsection A has contracted to pay, regardless of whether it is more than the contract rate of interest and the fact appears on the face of the contract.

History.

1987, c. 622, § 6.1-330.76; 1988, c. 765; 1993, c. 113; 2010, c. 794.